Wyoming, session 2025, HB0067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-715(n)(intro) and 9-7-107 by
creating a new subsection (j) are amended to read:

9-4-715. Permissible investments.

(n) The state treasurer shall not invest state funds
for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the
legislature in excess of a total of one billion dollars
HB0067

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0018
($1,000,000,000.00), excluding investments made pursuant to
W.S. 9-7-107(j), 37-5-406 or 37-5-605. By November 1 of
each calendar year, the state treasurer, in consultation
with the board, the Wyoming water development office, the
Wyoming business council and the office of state lands and
investments, shall provide a report to the select committee
on capital financing and investments and the investment
funds committee on all state funds invested for a specific
public purpose authorized or directed by the legislature.
The report shall include:

9-7-107. Community development authority; revenue
bonds; issuance.

(j) The state treasurer shall invest and keep
invested a sum not to exceed sixty million dollars
($60,000,000.00), from any monies available in the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, in bonds issued by
the authority pursuant to W.S. 9-7-106(a)(vi) to finance
mortgage loans to veterans and first time homebuyers at a
rate that is two percent (2%) below the available mortgage
rate. The limitation on specific public purpose investments
under W.S. 9-4-715(n) shall not apply to investments made
HB0067

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0018
under this subsection. This subsection is repealed July 1,
2028.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0067